District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-1010

Penalty for engaging in cockfighting or animal fighting.

Repealed.

History

June 25, 1892, 27 Stat. 61, ch. 135, § 6
Oct. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-176, § 7(d), 35 DCR 4787
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 103, 41 DCR 2608
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-303, § 3(a), 47 DCR 7307

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-810.
1973 Ed., § 22-810.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 103 of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).